Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6046.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) There is hereby established a Washington division of civil air patrol which shall consist of volunteer members who are volunteer civilian members of the Washington wing of the federally chartered civil air patrol.(2) The commanding officer of the Washington wing of the federally chartered civil air patrol shall be the head of the Washington division of civil air patrol. In the event of a vacancy in the office of commanding officer, or in the event the commanding officer shall decline or is unable to serve as head of the division, the civil air patrol shall designate another officer thereof to be the acting commanding officer. Any such acting head of the division shall serve during any interim in which the office of commanding officer remains vacant or in which the declination or inability of the commanding officer to serve remains in effect and any such acting head shall have and exercise all of the rights, powers, and authority, and shall perform all of the functions and duties of the head of the division.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The Washington division of civil air patrol will be available to serve at the call of the governor when ordered to active state service. The Washington division of civil air patrol shall consist of commissioned and warrant officers, enlisted persons, and cadets under the provisions of this title.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) The Washington division of civil air patrol is hereby authorized to cooperate with any agency, authority, department or political subdivision of the state of Washington, or any federally recognized tribe within the state of Washington, upon request thereby, in the provision of cadet training, communications, disaster relief, cyber security missions, and search and rescue missions or assistance, or in the performance of other related functions which are within the scope of activity of the federally chartered civil air patrol.(2) The head of the Washington division of civil air patrol may enter into agreements with any agency, authority, department or political subdivision of the state, or federally recognized tribe within the state, for the performance, in cooperation therewith, of any of the functions specified in subsection (1) of this section and may accept from any such agency, authority, department or political subdivision, or federally recognized tribe reimbursement for expenses incurred by the division in connection with the performance of such functions.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. The director of the Washington division of civil air patrol may employ such personnel and may make such expenditures within the appropriation therefor, or from other funds made available for purposes of agency operations, as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. Nothing in this act shall operate or be construed in any manner so as to change or affect the operation of the Washington wing of the federally chartered civil air patrol or to change or affect any existing rights, powers, duties, or functions thereof or to prohibit or limit cooperation thereby with the United States government or with any agency, authority, or department thereof.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 38 RCW.--- END ---